Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-171.01
Approved nonvisual identifier, defined.

Approved nonvisual identifier means a nonvisual method of livestock identification approved by the Nebraska Brand Committee such as an electronic device, a nose print, a retinal scan, a DNA match, or any other such nonvisual method of livestock identification.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 3.